Washington statutes.
RCW 1.12.010

Code to be liberally construed.

The provisions of this code shall be liberally construed, and shall not be limited by any rule of strict construction.

[1891 c 23 s 1, part; Code 1881 ss 758, 1686; 1877 p 153 s 763; 1854 p 221 s 504; RRS s 144.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: (1) This section is a part of 1891 c 23 s 1. The introductory phrase of that section provides: "The following provisions relative to the construction of statutes shall be rules of construction and shall constitute a part of the code of procedure of this state:"

(2) This section was originally section 504 of the 1854 statute entitled "An act to regulate the practice and proceedings in civil actions." Section 504 of the 1854 statute reads as follows: "The provisions of this act shall be liberally construed and shall not be limited by any rule of strict construction." Identical language appears in Code of 1881 s 1686 relating to probate, and again in Code of 1881 s 758, being part of "An act to regulate the practice and proceedings in civil actions" except that in the latter instance the 1881 codifier changed the words "this act" to read "this code."